Illinois, session 104th, HB4387.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Corporate Ownership of Residential Property Act. 6    Section 5. Findings and purpose. The General Assembly 7finds and declares the following:8        (1) Residential housing is a critical public good 9    essential to the health, safety, and welfare of the people 10    of Illinois.11        (2) A growing number of residential properties are 12    being acquired and held by corporations and institutional 13    investors, which contributes to rising housing costs, 14    reduced homeownership opportunities, and displacement of 15    long-term community members.16        (3) The concentration of residential property 17    ownership by non-natural persons presents a threat to the 18    accessibility and affordability of housing in Illinois.19        (4) It is in the public interest to limit the number of 20    residential properties that a company may own and to 21    ensure transparency in property ownership. 22    Section 10. Definitions. As used in this Act:  HB4387- 2 -LRB104 17495 JRC 30921 b1    "Affiliate" means a person or entity that, directly or 2indirectly through one or more intermediaries, controls, is 3controlled by, or is under common control with another person 4or entity.5    "Company" means (i) any legal entity that is not a natural 6person, including corporations, limited liability companies, 7partnerships, real estate investment trusts, or other entities 8and (ii) any group of such entities under common ownership or 9control or with overlapping beneficial interests of at least 1025%.11    "Department" means the Department of Financial and 12Professional Regulation.13    "Nominee" means a person or entity who holds bare legal 14title without having a beneficial interest for the benefit of 15some other person or entity.16    "Own" or "ownership" includes direct or indirect legal, 17equitable, or beneficial interest in property, including 18through affiliated entities, land trusts, nominee agreements, 19temporary holding structures, or any other form of agency.20    "Residential property" means any real property located in 21this State that is improved by one to 4 dwelling units or any 22single condominium, townhouse, or cooperative unit intended 23for human habitation, including properties used for short-term 24rental or combined into multiunit developments. 25    Section 15. Ownership limitation. Beginning January 1,   HB4387- 3 -LRB104 17495 JRC 30921 b12027, no company to which this Act applies may own more than 2500 residential properties in Illinois, including any 3residential property held by affiliated entities or persons. 4    Section 20. Exemptions. This Act does not apply to:5        (1) governmental or public housing authorities;6        (2) nonprofit organizations certified by the 7    Department for affordable housing;8        (3) development entities selling units within 24 9    months;10        (4) financial institutions holding properties through 11    foreclosure for less than 12 months; or12        (5) residential property used as a primary residence 13    by a natural person, including, but not limited to, 14    residential property held in a revocable living trust or a 15    single-member entity established solely for estate 16    planning or liability purposes. 17    Section 25. Registration and disclosure. 18    (a) On or before January 1, 2027, each company to which 19this Act applies that owns more than 500 residential 20properties must register with the Department.21    (b) The company's registration must include:22        (1) a list of all residential properties it owns;23        (2) a disclosure of all affiliated entities and 24    beneficial owners for these residential properties; and  HB4387- 4 -LRB104 17495 JRC 30921 b1        (3) an affirmation of compliance with this Act.2    (c) Registration must be renewed annually. The Department 3may impose fines not to exceed $100,000 for filings that are 4knowingly false or that contain material omissions. The fines 5described in this subsection (c) do not apply to clerical 6errors or good-faith mistakes. The Department may impose fines 7based on the severity of the false misrepresentation or 8omission.9    (d) The Department may initiate investigations into 10suspected circumvention.11    (e) On or before January 1, 2027, each company to which 12this Act applies that owns more than 200 but less than 500 13residential properties must provide annually to the Department 14the following information:15        (1) a list of all residential properties owned; 16        (2) a disclosure of all affiliated entities and 17    beneficial owners for the residential properties; and18        (3) an affirmation of compliance with this Act.  19    Section 30. Evasion prohibited. A person may not knowingly 20acquire residential property in violation of this Act through 21the use of an affiliated entity or nominee purchaser. A 22violation must be established through evidence of knowing 23circumvention. No presumption of invalidity applies to any 24transfer.   HB4387- 5 -LRB104 17495 JRC 30921 b1    Section 35. Civil penalties. A person who violates this 2Act is subject to repayment of any improperly obtained benefit 3and a civil penalty not to exceed 25% of that benefit. The 4Department must determine the amount of the repayment and to 5whom receives it under this Section. No other per-property 6per-day, or per-month penalties may be imposed under this Act. 7    Section 40. Rulemaking. The Department must adopt rules to 8implement and administer this Act by no later than January 1, 92027. 10    Section 90. Home Rule. A home rule unit may not regulate 11corporate ownership of residential property in a manner less 12restrictive than the regulation by the State as provided in 13this Act. This Section is a limitation under subsection (i) of 14Section 6 of Article VII of the Illinois Constitution on the 15concurrent exercise by home rule units of powers and functions 16exercised by the State. 17    Section 95. Applicability. This Act applies only to the 18acquisition of residential property occurring on or after the 19effective date of this Act. Nothing in this Act may be 20construed to require the sale, divestiture, or restriction of 21residential property lawfully owned before the effective date 22of this Act.   HB4387- 6 -LRB104 17495 JRC 30921 b1    Section 97. Severability. The provisions of this Act are 2severable under Section 1.31 of the Statute on Statutes. 3    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 4becoming law.